District of Columbia statutes.
7-1603

Residential health-care facility.

(a)

In preparing the comprehensive plan mandated in § 7-1602, the Mayor shall investigate the need for a residential health-care facility or facilities which shall provide a program of medical, nursing, counseling, palliative, social, recreational, and supportive services to AIDS patients and their families.

(b)

If, following an investigation, the Mayor identifies a need for a residential health-care facility or facilities in the District of Columbia, the Mayor shall establish the facility or facilities.

(c)

In order to establish the facility or facilities, the Mayor may acquire, by purchase, rehabilitation, condemnation, rental, or otherwise, a building or buildings suitable for use as a residential health-care facility or facilities, including furniture, medical equipment, and other necessary accessories.

(d)

The Mayor may enter into contractual arrangements with any agency or organization qualified to provide the services enumerated in subsection (a) of this section.

June 10, 1986, D.C. Law 6-121, § 4, 33 DCR 2451
This section is referenced in § 7-1602.
1981 Ed., § 6-2803.